South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S904.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 3, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Article 156 Quail Forever Specialty License Plate Section 56-3-16510.  The Department of Motor Vehicles may issue "Quail Forever" special license plates to owners of private passenger motor vehicles or motorcycles registered in their names. The requirements for production and distribution of the plate are those set forth in Section 56-3-8100. The biennial fee for this plate is the regular registration fee set forth in Article 5, Chapter 3 of this title plus an additional fee of seventy dollars. Any portion of the additional seventy-dollar fee not set aside by the Comptroller General to defray costs of production and distribution must be distributed to Quail Forever, and those funds will be used exclusively in South Carolina in partnership with the South Carolina Department of Natural Resources to further Quail Forever's mission to influence bobwhite habitat conservation to support long-term and healthy quail populations in South Carolina. The department may issue this special license plate six months following the approval of its design. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----